Vermont statutes. Title 11A Vermont Business Corporations
Subchapter 1. Board of Directors

§ 8.01.
Requirement for and duties of board of directors.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, each corporation must have a board of directors.

All corporate powers shall be exercised by or under the authority of, and the business and affairs of the corporation managed under the direction of, its board of directors, subject to any limitation set forth in the articles of incorporation.

A close corporation may dispense with or limit the authority of a board of directors by describing in its articles of incorporation who will perform some or all of the duties of a board of directors, pursuant to section 20.09 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 8.02.
Qualifications of directors.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may prescribe qualifications for directors. A director need not be a resident of this State or a shareholder of the corporation unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws so prescribe.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 8.03.
Number and election of directors.

A board of directors of a corporation which is not a close corporation dispensing with a board of directors pursuant to section 20.08 of this title must consist of one or more individuals, with the number specified in or fixed in accordance with the articles of incorporation or bylaws. The number of directors may be increased or decreased from time to time by amendment to, or in the manner provided in, the articles of incorporation or the bylaws.

Directors are elected at the first annual shareholders’ meeting and at each annual meeting thereafter unless their terms are staggered under section 8.06 of this title.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may establish a variable range for the size of the board of directors by fixing a minimum and a maximum number of members, and shall state the manner in which the positions so created are to be filled. Prior to the issuance of shares the directors may adopt or change such a provision; subsequent to the issuance of shares only the shareholders may do so. If a variable range is established, the number of directors may be fixed or changed from time to time, within the minimum and maximum, by the shareholders or the board of directors. With respect to a close corporation, only the shareholders may fix or change the number of directors.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994; amended

2007, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 92, June 6, 2008.

§ 8.04.
Election of directors by certain classes of shareholders.

If the articles of incorporation authorize dividing the shares into classes, the articles may also authorize the election of all or a specified number of directors by the holders of one or more authorized classes of shares. A class (or classes) of shares entitled to elect one or more directors is a separate voting group for purposes of the election of directors.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 8.05.
Terms of directors generally.

The terms of the initial directors of a corporation expire at the first shareholders’ meeting at which directors are elected.

The terms of all other directors expire at the next annual shareholders’ meeting following their election unless their terms are staggered under section 8.06 of this title.

A decrease in the number of directors does not shorten an incumbent director’s term.

The term of a director elected to fill a vacancy shall be elected for the unexpired term of the director’s predecessor in office.

Despite the expiration of a director’s term, the director continues to serve until the director’s successor is elected and qualifies or until there is a decrease in the number of directors.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 8.06.
Staggered terms for directors.

The articles of incorporation may provide for staggering their terms by dividing the total number of directors into two, three, four, or five groups, with each group containing one-half, one-third, one-quarter, or one-fifth of the total, as near as may be. In that event, the terms of directors in the first group expire at the first annual shareholders’ meeting after their election, the terms of the second group expire at the second annual shareholders’ meeting after their election, and the terms of the third group, fourth group, and fifth group, if any, expire at the third, fourth, or fifth annual shareholders’ meeting after their election. At each annual shareholders’ meeting held thereafter, directors shall be chosen for a term not to exceed five years, as the case may be, to succeed those whose terms expire.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 8.07.
Resignation of directors.

A director may resign at any time by delivering written notice to the board of directors, its chair, or to the president or other officer responsible for recording the minutes of the meetings of the shareholders and directors of the corporation.

A resignation is effective when the notice is delivered unless the notice specifies a later effective date.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 8.08.
Removal of directors by shareholders.

The shareholders may remove one or more directors with or without cause unless the articles of incorporation provide that directors may be removed only for cause.

If a director is elected by a voting group of shareholders, only the shareholders of that voting group may participate in the vote to remove the director.

If cumulative voting is authorized, a director may not be removed if the number of votes sufficient to elect the director under cumulative voting is voted against the director’s removal. If cumulative voting is not authorized, a director may be removed only if the number of votes cast to remove the director exceeds the number of votes cast not to remove the director.

A director may be removed by the shareholders only at a meeting called for the purpose of removing the director and the meeting notice must state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is removal of the director.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 8.09.
Removal of directors by judicial proceeding.

The Superior Court may remove a director of the corporation from office in a proceeding commenced either by the corporation or by its shareholders holding at least ten percent of the outstanding shares of any class if the court finds that:
(a) (1) The Superior Court may remove a director of the corporation from office in a proceeding commenced either by the corporation or by its shareholders holding at least ten percent of the outstanding shares of any class if the court finds that:

the director engaged in fraudulent or dishonest conduct relating to the corporation, or in a gross abuse of authority or discretion relating to the corporation; and

removal is in the best interest of the corporation.

The petition for removal shall be filed:

in the county where the corporation’s principal office is located;

in the county where the corporation’s registered office is located if the corporation has no principal office in this State; or

in the Washington County Superior Court where the corporation has no principal office or registered office in this State.

The court that removes a director may bar the director from reelection for a period prescribed by the court.

If shareholders commence a proceeding under subsection (a) of this section, they shall make the corporation a party defendant.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 8.10.
Vacancy on board.

If a vacancy occurs on the board of directors, including a vacancy resulting from an increase in the number of directors:
(a) (1) If a vacancy occurs on the board of directors, including a vacancy resulting from an increase in the number of directors:

the shareholders may fill the vacancy;

the board of directors may fill the vacancy; or

if the directors remaining in office constitute fewer than a quorum of the board, they may fill the vacancy by the affirmative vote of a majority of all the directors remaining in office.

The articles of incorporation may require that the manner of filling a vacancy on the board of directors shall be limited to any one or more of the methods authorized by subdivision (1) of this subsection.

If the vacant office was held by a director elected by a voting group of shareholders, only the holders of shares of that voting group are entitled to vote to fill the vacancy if it is filled by the shareholders.

A vacancy that will occur at a specific later date (by reason of a resignation effective at a later date under subsection 8.07(b) of this title or otherwise) may be filled before the vacancy occurs but the new director may not take office until the vacancy occurs.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 8.11.
Compensation of directors.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors may fix the compensation of directors.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.